Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-132
Bonds of municipal corporation or political subdivision; seal.

If any public officer, county clerk, city clerk, or secretary of any governing body is required to affix the seal of his or her office to any such bond or evidence of indebtedness, the seal may be a facsimile of such seal printed on the bond or evidence of indebtedness.

Laws 1977, LB 265, § 2;

Laws 2001, LB 420, § 10.